Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.230

Seizure and forfeiture.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1440-S2.SL) ***

(1) The following personal property is subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them: All personal property including, but not limited to, any item, object, tool, substance, device, weapon, machine, vehicle of any kind, money, security, or negotiable instrument, which the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence was used or intended to be used by its owner or the person in charge to knowingly or intentionally facilitate the commission of, or to knowingly or intentionally abet the commission of, a crime involving theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property, or which the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence was knowingly or intentionally furnished or was intended to be furnished by any person in the commission of, as a result of, or as compensation for the commission of, a crime involving theft, trafficking, or the unlawful possession of commercial metal property, or which the property owner acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to a knowing or intentional commission of a crime involving the theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property provided that such activity is not less than a class C felony; except that:

(a) No vehicle used by any person as a common carrier in the transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under this section unless the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the owner or other person in charge of the vehicle is a consenting party or is privy to any crime involving theft, trafficking, or the unlawful possession of commercial metal property;

(b) A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had actual or constructive knowledge of nor consented to the commission of any crime involving the theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property; and

(c) A property owner's property is not subject to seizure if an employee or agent of that property owner uses the property owner's property to knowingly or intentionally facilitate the commission of, or to knowingly or intentionally aid and abet the commission of, a crime involving theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property, in violation of that property owner's instructions or policies against such activity, and without the property owner's knowledge or consent.

(2) The following real property is subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right exists in them: All real property, including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot or tract of land, and any appurtenances or improvements, that the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence are being used with the knowledge of the owner for the intentional commission of any crime involving the theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property, or which have been acquired in whole or in part with proceeds traceable to the commission of any crime involving the trafficking, theft, or unlawful possession of commercial metal, if such activity is not less than a class C felony and a substantial nexus exists between the commission of the violation or crime and the real property. However:

(a) No property may be forfeited pursuant to this subsection (2), to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or omission committed or omitted without the owner's actual or constructive knowledge; and further, a property owner's real property is not subject to seizure if an employee or agent of that property owner uses the property owner's real property to knowingly or intentionally facilitate the commission of, or to knowingly or intentionally aid and abet the commission of, a crime involving theft, trafficking, or unlawful possession of commercial metal property, in violation of that property owner's instructions or policies against such activity, and without the property owner's knowledge or consent; and

(b) A forfeiture of real property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party, neither had actual or constructive knowledge, nor consented to the act or omission.

(3) Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of real property shall include the filing of a lis pendens by the seizing agency. Real property seized under this section shall not be transferred or otherwise conveyed until ninety days after seizure or until a judgment of forfeiture is entered, whichever is later: PROVIDED, That real property seized under this section may be transferred or conveyed to any person or entity who acquires title by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure of a security interest. Seizure of personal property without process may be made if:

(a) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant; or

(b) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding.

(4) In the event of seizure pursuant to this section, proceedings for forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure and intended forfeiture of the seized property. Service of notice of seizure of real property shall be made according to the rules of civil procedure. However, the state may not obtain a default judgment with respect to real property against a party who is served by substituted service absent an affidavit stating that a good faith effort has been made to ascertain if the defaulted party is incarcerated within the state, and that there is no present basis to believe that the party is incarcerated within the state. The notice of seizure of personal property may be served by any method authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed complete upon mailing within the fifteen-day period following the seizure. Notice of seizure in the case of property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by filing a financing statement in accordance with chapter 62A.9A RCW, or a certificate of title shall be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of title.

(5) If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in subsection (1) of this section within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property interest in real property of a person whose spouse or domestic partner committed a violation giving rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not participate in the violation.

(6) If a person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession of the seized property within forty-five days of the seizure in the case of personal property and ninety days in the case of real property, the law enforcement agency shall give the person or persons a reasonable opportunity to be heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law enforcement officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state agency as defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal may only be accomplished according to the rules of civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that operates the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW 4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the person seeking removal has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of ownership or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be removed shall be the district court when the aggregate value of the property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title 34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the property involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment for costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. The burden of producing evidence shall be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the property.

(7) At the hearing, the seizing agency has the burden of proof to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that seized property is subject to forfeiture, and that the use or intended use of the seized property in connection with a crime pursuant to this section occurred with the owner's actual or constructive knowledge or consent. The person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to have the lawful right to possession of the property has the burden of proof to establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the person owns or has a right to possess the seized property. The possession of bare legal title is not sufficient to establish ownership of seized property if the seizing agency proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the person claiming ownership or right to possession is a nominal owner and did not actually own or exert a controlling interest in the property.

The seizing law enforcement agency shall promptly return the property to the claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession of the property.

(8) When property is forfeited under this chapter, after satisfying any court-ordered victim restitution, the seizing law enforcement agency may:

(a) Retain it for official use or, upon application by any law enforcement agency of this state, release such property to such agency; or

(b) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is not harmful to the public.

(9)(a) Within one hundred twenty days after the entry of an order of forfeiture, each seizing agency shall remit to, if known, the victim of the crime involving the seized property, an amount equal to fifty percent of the net proceeds of any property forfeited.

(b) Retained property and net proceeds not required to be paid to victims shall be retained by the seizing law enforcement agency exclusively for the expansion and improvement of law enforcement activity. Money retained under this section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding sources.

(c) The net proceeds of forfeited property is the value of the forfeitable interest in the property after deducting the cost of satisfying any bona fide security interest to which the property is subject at the time of seizure; and in the case of sold property, after deducting the cost of sale, including reasonable fees or commissions paid to independent selling agents, and the cost of any valid landlord's claim for damages.

(d) The value of sold forfeited property is the sale price. The value of retained forfeited property is the fair market value of the property at the time of seizure, determined when possible by reference to an applicable commonly used index, such as the index used by the department of licensing for valuation of motor vehicles. A seizing agency may use, but need not use, an independent qualified appraiser to determine the value of retained property. If an appraiser is used, the value of the property appraised is net of the cost of the appraisal. The value of destroyed property and retained firearms or illegal property is zero.

(10) Upon the entry of an order of forfeiture of real property, the court shall forward a copy of the order to the assessor of the county in which the property is located. Orders for the forfeiture of real property shall be entered by the superior court, subject to court rules. Such an order shall be filed by the seizing agency in the county auditor's records in the county in which the real property is located.

[ 2013 c 322 s 27.]